Hawaii statutes.
[§431:30-111] Meetings and acts of the
commission. (a) The commission shall meet and take such actions as are
consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws.

(b) Each member of the commission may cast a
vote to which that compacting state is entitled and to participate in the
business and affairs of the commission. A member shall vote in person or by
such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for
members' participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.

(c) The commission shall meet at least once
during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in
the bylaws. [L 2004, c 104, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next